Chapter 9
Flotsam and Jetsam
 Gandalf and the King's company rode away, turning eastward to make the circuit of
the ruined walls of Isengard. But Aragorn, Gimli, and Legolas remained behind.
Leaving Arod and Hasufel to stray in search of grass, they came and sat beside the
hobbits.
 'Well, well! The hunt is over, and we meet again at last, where none of us ever
 107
thought to come,' said Aragorn.
 'And now that the great ones have gone to discuss high matters,' said Legolas, 'the
hunters can perhaps learn the answers to their own small riddles. We tracked you as
far as the forest, but there are still many things that I should like to know the truth of.'
 'And there is a great deal, too, that we want to know about you,' said Merry. 'We
have learnt a few things through Treebeard, the Old Ent, but that is not nearly
enough.'
 'All in good time,' said Legolas. 'We were the hunters, and you should give an
account of yourselves to us first.'
 'Or second,' said Gimli. 'It would go better after a meal. I have a sore head; and it is
past mid-day. You truants might make amends by finding us some of the plunder
that you spoke of. Food and drink would pay off some of my score against you.'
 'Then you shall have it,' said Pippin. 'Will you have it here, or in more comfort in
what's left of Saruman's guard-house – over there under the arch? We had to picnic
out here, so as to keep an eye on the road.'
 'Less than an eye!' said Gimli. 'But I will not go into any orc-house nor touch Orcs'
meat or anything that they have mauled.'
 'We wouldn't ask you to,' said Merry. 'We have had enough of Orcs ourselves to
last a life-time. But there were many other folk in Isengard. Saruman kept enough
wisdom not to trust his Orcs. He had Men to guard his gates: some of his most
faithful servants, I suppose. Anyway they were favoured and got good provisions.'
 'And pipe-weed?' asked Gimli.
 'No, I don't think so,' Merry laughed. 'But that is another story, which can wait until
after lunch.'
 'Well let us go and have lunch then!' said the Dwarf.
 The hobbits led the way; and they passed under the arch and came to a wide door
upon the left, at the top of a stair. It opened direct into a large chamber, with other
smaller doors at the far end, and a hearth and chimney at one side. The chamber
was hewn out of the stone; and it must once have been dark, for its windows looked
out only into the tunnel. But light came in now through the broken roof. On the hearth
wood was burning.
 'I lit a bit of fire,' said Pippin. 'It cheered us up in the fogs. There were few faggots
about, and most of the wood we could find was wet. But there is a great draught in
the chimney: it seems to wind away up through the rock, and fortunately it has not
been blocked. A fire is handy. I will make you some toast. The bread is three or four
days old, I am afraid.'
 Aragorn and his companions sat themselves down at one end of a long table, and
the hobbits disappeared through one of the inner doors. 'Store-room in there, and
above the woods, luckily,' said Pippin, as they came back laden with dishes, bowls,
cups, knives, and food of various sorts.
 'And you need not turn up your nose at the provender, Master Gimli,' said Merry.
'This is not orc-stuff, but man-food, as Treebeard calls it. Will you have wine or beer?
There's a barrel inside there – very passable. And this is first-rate salted pork. Or I
can cut you some rashers of bacon and broil them, if you like. I am sorry there is no
green stuff: the deliveries have been rather interrupted in the last few days! I cannot
offer you anything to follow but butter and honey for your bread. Are you content?'
 'Indeed yes,' said Gimli. 'The score is much reduced.'
 The three were soon busy with their meal; and the two hobbits, unabashed, set to
a second time. 'We must keep our guests company,' they said.
 'You are full of courtesy this morning,' laughed Legolas. 'But maybe, if we had not
 108
arrived, you would already have been keeping one another company again.'
 'Maybe; and why not?' said Pippin. 'We had foul fare with the Orcs, and little
enough for days before that. It seems a long while since we could eat to heart's
content.'
 'It does not seem to have done you any harm,' said Aragorn. 'Indeed you look in
the bloom of health.'
 'Aye, you do indeed,' said Gimli, looking them up and down over the top of his cup.
'Why, your hair is twice as thick and curly as when we parted; and I would swear that
you have both grown somewhat, if that is possible for hobbits of your age. This
Treebeard at any rate has not starved you.'
 'He has not,' said Merry. 'But Ents only drink, and drink is not enough for content.
Treebeard's draughts may be nourishing, but one feels the need of something solid.
And even lembas is none the worse for a change.'
 'You have drunk of the waters of the Ents, have you?' said Legolas. 'Ah, then I
think it is likely that Gimli's eyes do not deceive him. Strange songs have been sung
of the draughts of Fangorn.'
 'Many strange tales have been told about that land,' said Aragorn. 'I have never
entered it. Come, tell me more about it, and about the Ents!'
 'Ents,' said Pippin, 'Ents are – well Ents are all different for on thing. But their eyes
now, their eyes are very odd.' He tried a few fumbling words that trailed off into
silence. 'Oh, well,' he went on, 'you have seen some at a distance, already-they saw
you at any rate, and reported that you were on the way-and you will see many
others, I expect, before you leave here. You must form your own ideas.'
 'Now, now!' said Gimli. 'We are beginning the story in the middle. I should like a
tale in the right order, starting with that strange day when our fellowship was broken.'
 'You shall have it, if there is time,' said Merry. 'But first – if you have finished eating
– you shall fill your pipes and light up. And then for a little while we can pretend that
we are all back safe at Bree again, or in Rivendell.'
 He produced a small leather bag full of tobacco. 'We have heaps of it,' he said,
'and you can all pack as much as you wish, when we go. We did some salvage-work
this morning, Pippin and I. There are lots of things floating about. It was Pippin who
found two small barrels, washed up out of some cellar or store-house, I suppose.
When we opened them, we found they were filled with this: as fine a pipe-weed as
you could wish for, and quite unspoilt.'
 Gimli took some and rubbed it in his palms and sniffed it. 'It feels good, and it
smells good,' he said.
 'It is good!' said Merry. 'My dear Gimli, it is Longbottom Leaf! There were the
Hornblower brandmarks on the barrels, as plain as plain. How it came here, I can't
imagine. For Saruman's private use, I fancy. I never knew that it went so far abroad.
But it comes in handy now?'
 'It would,' said Gimli, 'if I had a pipe to go with it. Alas, I lost mine in Moria, or
before. Is there no pipe in all your plunder?'
 'No, I am afraid not,' said Merry. 'We have not found any, not even here in the
guardrooms. Saruman kept this dainty to himself, it seems. And I don't think it would
be any use knocking on the doors of Orthanc to beg a pipe of him! We shall have to
share pipes, as good friends must at a pinch.'
 'Half a moment!' said Pippin. Putting his hand inside the breast of his jacket he
pulled out a little soft wallet on a string. 'I keep a treasure or two near my skin, as
precious as Rings to me. Here's one: my old wooden pipe. And here's another: an
unused one. I have carried it a long way, though I don't know why. I never really
 109
expected to find any pipe-weed on the journey, when my own ran out. But now it
comes in useful after all.' He held up a small pipe with a wide flattened bowl, and
handed it to Gimli. 'Does that settle the score between us?' he said. 'Settle it!' cried
Gimli. 'Most noble hobbit, it leaves me deep in your debt.'
 'Well, I am going back into the open air, to see what the wind and sky are doing!'
said Legolas.
 'We will come with you,' said Aragorn.
 They went out and seated themselves upon the piled stones before the gateway.
They could see far down into the valley now; the mists were lifting and floating away
upon the breeze.
 'Now let us take our ease here for a little!' said Aragorn. 'We will sit on the edge of
ruin and talk, as Gandalf says, while he is busy elsewhere. I feel a weariness such
as I have seldom felt before.' He wrapped his grey cloak about him, hiding his mailshirt, and stretched
out his long legs. Then he lay back and sent from his lips a thin
stream of smoke.
 'Look!' said Pippin. 'Strider the Ranger has come back!'
 'He has never been away,' said Aragorn. 'I am Strider and Dunadan too, and I
belong both to Gondor and the North.'
 They smoked in silence for a while, and the sun shone on them; slanting into the
valley from among white clouds high in the West. Legolas lay still, looking up at the
sun and sky with steady eyes, and singing softly to himself. At last he sat up. 'Come
now!' he said. 'Time wears on, and the mists are blowing away, or would if you
strange folk did not wreathe yourselves in smoke. What of the tale?'
 'Well, my tale begins with waking up in the dark and finding myself all strung-up in
an orc-camp,' said Pippin. 'Let me see, what is today?'
 'The fifth of March in the Shire-reckoning,' said Aragorn.
 Pippin made some calculations on his fingers. 'Only nine days ago!' he said.2
 'It
seems a year since we were caught. Well, though half of it was like a bad dream, I
reckon that three very horrible days followed. Merry will correct me, if I forget
anything important: I am not going into details: the whips and the filth and stench and
all that; it does not bear remembering.' With that he plunged into an account of
Boromir's last fight and the orc-march from Emyn Muil to the Forest. The others
nodded as the various points were fitted in with their guesses.
 'Here are some treasures that you let fall,' said Aragorn. 'You will be glad to have
them back.' He loosened his belt from under his cloak and took from it the two
sheathed knives.
 'Well!' said Merry. 'I never expected to see those again! I marked a few orcs with
mine; but Ugluk took them from us. How he glared! At first I thought he was going to
stab me, but he threw the things away as if they burned him.'
 'And here also is your brooch, Pippin,' said Aragorn. 'I have kept it safe, for it is a
very precious thing.'
 'I know,' said Pippin. 'It was a wrench to let it go; but what else could I do?'
 'Nothing else,' answered Aragorn. 'One who cannot cast away a treasure at need
is in fetters. You did rightly.'
 'The cutting of the bands on your wrists, that was smart work!' said Gimli. 'Luck
served you there; but you seized your chance with both hands, one might say.'
 'And set us a pretty riddle,' said Legolas. 'I wondered if you had grown wings!'
 'Unfortunately not,' said Pippin. 'But you did not know about Grishnakh.' He
shuddered and said no more, leaving Merry to tell of those last horrible moments: the
pawing hands, the hot breath, and the dreadful strength of Grishnakh's hairy arms.
 110
 'All this about the Orcs of Barad-dur, Lugburz as they call it, makes me uneasy,'
said Aragorn. 'The Dark Lord already knew too much and his servants also; and
Grishnakh evidently sent some message across the River after the quarrel. The Red
Eye will be looking towards Isengard. But Saruman at any rate is in a cleft stick of his
own cutting.'
 'Yes, whichever side wins, his outlook is poor,' said Merry. 'Things began to go all
wrong for him from the moment his Orcs set foot in Rohan.'
 'We caught a glimpse of the old villain, or so Gandalf hints,' said Gimli. 'On the
edge of the Forest.'
 'When was that?' asked Pippin.
 'Five nights ago,' said Aragorn.
 'Let me see,' said Merry, 'five nights ago – now we come to a part of the story you
know nothing about. We met Treebeard that morning after the battle; and that night
we were at Wellinghall, one of his ent-houses. The next morning we went to
Entmoot, a gathering of Ents, that is, and the queerest thing I have ever seen in my
life. It lasted all that day and the next; and we spent the nights with an Ent called
Quickbeam. And then late in the afternoon in the third day of their moot, the Ents
suddenly blew up. It was amazing. The Forest had felt as tense as if a thunderstorm
was brewing inside it: then all at once it exploded. I wish you could have heard their
song as they marched.'
 'If Saruman had heard it, he would be a hundred miles away by now, even if he
had had to run on his own legs,' said Pippin.
'Though Isengard be strong and hard, as cold as stone and bare as bone,
We go, we go, we go to war, to hew the stone and break the door!
 There was very much more. A great deal of the song had no words, and was like a
music of horns and drums. It was very exciting. But I thought it was only marching
music and no more, just a song – until I got here. I know better now.'
 'We came down over the last ridge into Nan Curunir, after night had fallen,' Merry
continued. 'It was then that I first had the feeling that the Forest itself was moving
behind us. I thought I was dreaming an entish dream, but Pippin had noticed it too.
We were both frightened; but we did not find out more about it until later.
 'It was the Huorns, or so the Ents call them in "short language". Treebeard won't
say much about them, but I think they are Ents that have become almost like trees,
at least to look at. They stand here and there in the wood or under its eaves, silent,
watching endlessly over the trees; but deep in the darkest dales there are hundreds
and hundreds of them, I believe.
 'There is a great power in them, and they seem able to wrap themselves in
shadow: it is difficult to see them moving. But they do. They can move very quickly, if
they are angry. You stand still looking at the weather, maybe, or listening to the
rustling of the wind, and then suddenly you find that you are in the middle of a wood
with great groping trees all around you. They still have voices, and can speak with
the Ents – that is why they are called Huorns, Treebeard says – but they have
become queer and wild. Dangerous. I should be terrified of meeting them, if there
were no true Ents about to look after them.
 'Well, in the early night we crept down a long ravine into the upper end of the
Wizard's Vale, the Ents with all their rustling Huorns behind. We could not see them,
of course, but the whole air was full of creaking. It was very dark, a cloudy night.
They moved at a great speed as soon as they had left the hills, and made a noise
 111
like a rushing wind. The Moon did not appear through the clouds, and not long after
midnight there was a tall wood all round the north side of Isengard. There was no
sign of enemies nor of any challenge. There was a light gleaming from a high
window in the tower, that was all.
 'Treebeard and a few more Ents crept on, right round to within sight of the great
gates. Pippin and I were with him. We were sitting on Treebeard's shoulders, and I
could feel the quivering tenseness in him. But even when they are roused, Ents can
be very cautious and patient. They stood still as carved stones, breathing and
listening.
 'Then all at once there was a tremendous stir. Trumpets blared and the walls of
Isengard echoed. We thought that we had been discovered, and that battle was
going to begin. But nothing of the sort. All Saruman's people were marching away. I
don't know much about this war, or about the Horsemen of Rohan, but Saruman
seems to have meant to finish off the king and all his men with one final blow. He
emptied Isengard. I saw the enemy go: endless lines of marching Orcs; and troops of
them mounted on great wolves. And there were battalions of Men, too. Many of them
carried torches, and in the flare I could see their faces. Most of them were ordinary
men, rather tall and dark-haired, and grim but not particularly evil-looking. But there
were some others that were horrible: man-high, but with goblin-faces, sallow, leering,
squint-eyed. Do you know, they reminded me at once of that Southerner at Bree:
only he was not so obviously orc-like as most of these were.'
 'I thought of him too,' said Aragorn. 'We had many of these half-orcs to deal with at
Helm's Deep. It seems plain now that that Southerner was a spy of Saruman's; but
whether he was working with the Black Riders, or for Saruman alone, I do not know.
It is difficult with these evil folk to know when they are in league, and when they are
cheating one another.'
 'Well, of all sorts together, there must have been ten thousand at the very least,'
said Merry. 'They took an hour to pass out of the gates. Some went off down the
highway to the Fords, and some turned away and went eastward. A bridge has been
built down there, about a mile away, where the river runs in a very deep channel.
You could see it now, if you stood up. They were all singing with harsh voices, and
laughing, making a hideous din. I thought things looked very black for Rohan. But
Treebeard did not move. He said: 'My business is with Isengard tonight, with rock
and stone.'
 'But, though I could not see what was happening in the dark, I believe that Huorns
began to move south, as soon as the gates were shut again. Their business was
with Orcs I think. They were far down the valley in the morning; or any rate there was
a shadow there that one couldn't see through.
 'As soon as Saruman had sent off all his army, our turn came. Treebeard put us
down, and went up to the gates, and began hammering on the doors, and calling for
Saruman. There was no answer, except arrows and stones from the walls. But
arrows are no use against Ents. They hurt them, of course, and infuriate them: like
stinging flies. But an Ent can be stuck as full of orc-arrows as a pin-cushion, and take
no serious harm. They cannot be poisoned, for one thing; and their skin seems to be
very thick, and tougher than bark. It takes a very heavy axe-stroke to wound them
seriously. They don't like axes. But there would have to be a great many axe-men to
one Ent: a man that hacks once at an Ent never gets a chance of a second blow. A
punch from an Ent-fist crumples up iron like thin tin.
 'When Treebeard had got a few arrows in him, he began to warm up, to get
positively "hasty", as he would say. He let out a great hoom-hom, and a dozen more
 112
Ents came striding up. An angry Ent is terrifying. Their fingers, and their toes, just
freeze on to rock; and they tear it up like bread-crust. It was like watching the work of
great tree-roots in a hundred years, all packed into a few moments.
 'They pushed, pulled, tore, shook, and hammered; and clang-bang, crash-crack, in
five minutes they had these huge gates just lying in ruin; and some were already
beginning to eat into the walls, like rabbits in a sand-pit. I don't know what Saruman
thought was happening; but anyway he did not know how to deal with it. His wizardry
may have been falling off lately, of course; but anyway I think he has not much grit,
not much plain courage alone in a tight place without a lot of slaves and machines
and things, if you know what I mean. Very different from old Gandalf. I wonder if his
fame was not all along mainly due to his cleverness in settling at Isengard.'
 'No,' said Aragorn. 'Once he was as great as his fame made him. His knowledge
was deep, his thought was subtle, and his hands marvellously skilled; and he had a
power over the minds of others. The wise he could persuade, and the smaller folk he
could daunt. That power he certainly still keeps. There are not many in Middle-earth
that I should say were safe, if they were left alone to talk with him, even now when
he has suffered a defeat. Gandalf, Elrond, and Galadriel, perhaps, now that his
wickedness has been laid bare, but very few others.'
 'The Ents are safe,' said Pippin. 'He seems at one time to have got round them, but
never again. And anyway he did not understand them; and he made the great
mistake of leaving them out of his calculations. He had no plan for them, and there
was no time to make any, once they had set to work. As soon as our attack began,
the few remaining rats in Isengard started bolting through every hole that the Ents
made. The Ents let the Men go, after they had questioned them, two or three dozen
only down at this end. I don't think many orc-folk, of any size, escaped. Not from the
Huorns: there was a wood full of them all round Isengard by that time, as well as
those that had gone down the valley.
 'When the Ents had reduced a large part of the southern walls to rubbish, and what
was left of his people had bolted and deserted him, Saruman fled in a panic. He
seems to have been at the gates when we arrived: I expect he came to watch his
splendid army march out. When the Ents broke their way in, he left in a hurry. They
did not spot him at first. But the night had opened out, and there was a great light of
stars, quite enough for Ents to see by, and suddenly Quickbeam gave a cry "The
tree-killer, the tree-killer!" Quickbeam is a gentle creature, but he hates Saruman all
the more fiercely for that: his people suffered cruelly from orc-axes. He leapt down
the path from the inner gate, and he can move like a wind when he is roused. There
was a pale figure hurrying away in and out of the shadows of the pillars, and it had
nearly reached the stairs to the tower-door. But it was a near thing. Quickbeam was
so hot after him, that he was within a step or two of being caught and strangled when
he slipped in through the door.
 'When Saruman was safe back in Orthanc, it was not long before he set some of
his precious machinery to work. By that time there were many Ents inside Isengard:
some had followed Quickbeam, and others had burst in from the north and east; they
were roaming about and doing a great deal of damage. Suddenly up came fires and
foul fumes: the vents and shafts all over the plain began to spout and belch. Several
of the Ents got scorched and blistered. One of them, Beechbone I think he was
called, a very tall handsome Ent, got caught in a spray of some liquid fire and burned
like a torch: a horrible sight.
 'That sent them mad. I thought that they had been really roused before; but I was
wrong. I saw what it was like at last. It was staggering. They roared and boomed and
 113
trumpeted, until stones began to crack and fall at the mere noise of them. Merry and
I lay on the ground and stuffed our cloaks into our ears. Round and round the rock of
Orthanc the Ents went striding and storming like a howling gale, breaking pillars,
hurling avalanches of boulders down the shafts, tossing up huge slabs of stone into
the air like leaves. The tower was in the middle of a spinning whirlwind. I saw iron
posts and blocks of masonry go rocketing up hundreds of feet, and smash against
the windows of Orthanc. But Treebeard kept his head. He had not had any burns,
luckily. He did not want his folk to hurt themselves in their fury, and he did not want
Saruman to escape out of some hole in the confusion. Many of the Ents were hurling
themselves against the Orthanc-rock; but that defeated them. It is very smooth and
hard. Some wizardry is in it, perhaps, older and stronger than Saruman's. Anyway
they could not get a grip on it, or make a crack in it; and they were bruising and
wounding themselves against it. 'So Treebeard went out into the ring and shouted.
His enormous voice rose above all the din. There was a dead silence, suddenly. In it
we heard a shrill laugh from a high window in the tower. That had a queer effect on
the Ents. They had been boiling over; now they became cold, grim as ice, and quiet.
They left the plain and gathered round Treebeard, standing quite still. He spoke to
them for a little in their own language; I think he was telling them of a plan he had
made in his old head long before. Then they just faded silently away in the grey light.
Day was dawning by that time.
 'They set a watch on the tower, I believe, but the watchers were so well hidden in
shadows and kept so still, that I could not see them. The others went away north. All
that day they were busy, out of sight. Most of the time we were left alone. It was a
dreary day; and we wandered about a bit, though we kept out of the view of the
windows of Orthanc, as much as we could: they stared at us so threateningly. A
good deal of the time we spent looking for something to eat. And also we sat and
talked, wondering what was happening away south in Rohan, and what had become
of all the rest of our Company. Every now and then we could hear in the distance the
rattle and fall of stone, and thudding noises echoing in the hills.
 'In the afternoon we walked round the circle, and went to have a look at what was
going on. There was a great shadowy wood of Huorns at the head of the valley, and
another round the northern wall. We did not dare to go in. But there was a rending,
tearing noise of work going on inside. Ents and Huorns were digging great pits and
trenches, and making great pools and dams, gathering all the waters of the Isen and
every other spring and stream that they could find. We left them to it.
 'At dusk Treebeard came back to the gate. He was humming and booming to
himself, and seemed pleased. He stood and stretched his great arms and legs and
breathed deep. I asked him if he was tired.
 '"Tired?" he said, "tired? Well no, not tired, but stiff. I need a good draught of
Entwash. We have worked hard; we have done more stone-cracking and earthgnawing today than we
have done in many a long year before. But it is nearly
finished. When night falls do not linger near this gate or in the old tunnel! Water may
come through – and it will be foul water for a while, until all the filth of Saruman is
washed away. Then Isen can run clean again." He began to pull down a bit more of
the walls, in a leisurely sort of way, just to amuse himself.
 'We were just wondering where it would be safe to lie and get some sleep, when
the most amazing thing of all happened. There was the sound of a rider coming
swiftly up the road. Merry and I lay quiet, and Treebeard hid himself in the shadows
under the arch. Suddenly a great horse came striding up, like a flash of silver. It was
already dark. but I could see the rider's face clearly: it seemed to shine, and all his
 114
clothes were white. I just sat up, staring, with my mouth open. I tried to call out, and
couldn't.
 'There was no need. He halted just by us and looked down at us. 'Gandalf!' I said
at last. but my voice was only a whisper. Did he say: "Hullo, Pippin! This is a
pleasant surprise!"? No, indeed! He said: "Get up, you tom-fool of a Took! Where, in
the name of wonder, in all this ruin is Treebeard? I want him. Quick!"
 'Treebeard heard his voice and came out of the shadows at once; and there was a
strange meeting. I was surprised, because neither of them seemed surprised at all.
Gandalf obviously expected to find Treebeard here; and Treebeard might almost
have been loitering about near the gates on purpose to meet him. Yet we had told
the old Ent all about Moria. But then I remembered a queer look he gave us at the
time. I can only suppose that he had seen Gandalf or had some news of him, but
would not say anything in a hurry. "Don't be hasty" is his motto; but nobody, not even
Elves, will say much about Gandalf's movements when he is not there.
 '"Hoom! Gandalf!" said Treebeard. "I am glad you have come. Wood and water,
stock and stone, I can master; but there is a Wizard to manage here."
 '"Treebeard," said Gandalf. "I need your help. You have done much, but I need
more. I have about ten thousand Orcs to manage."
 'Then those two went off and had a council together in some corner. It must have
seemed very hasty to Treebeard, for Gandalf was in a tremendous hurry, and was
already talking at a great pace, before they passed out of hearing. They were only
away a matter of minutes, perhaps a quarter of an hour. Then Gandalf came back to
us, and he seemed relieved, almost merry. He did say he was glad to see us, then.
 '"But Gandalf," I cried, "where have you been? And have you seen the others?"
 '"Wherever I have been, I am back," he answered in the genuine Gandalf manner.
"Yes, I have seen some of the others. But news must wait. This is a perilous night,
and I must ride fast. But the dawn may be brighter; and if so, we shall meet again.
Take care of yourselves, and keep away from Orthanc! Good-bye!"
 'Treebeard was very thoughtful after Gandalf had gone. He had evidently learnt a
lot in a short time and was digesting it. He looked at us and said: "Hm, well, I find you
are not such hasty folk as I thought. You said much less than you might, and not
more than you should. Hm, this is a bundle of news and no mistake! Well, now
Treebeard must get busy again."
 'Before he went, we got a little news out of him; and it did not cheer us up at all.
But for the moment we thought more about you three than about Frodo and Sam, or
about poor Boromir. For we gathered that there was a great battle going on, or soon
would be, and that you were in it, and might never come out of it.
 '"Huorns will help," said Treebeard. Then he went away and we did not see him
again until this morning.
 'It was deep night. We lay on top of a pile of stone, and could see nothing beyond
it. Mist or shadows blotted out everything like a great blanket all round us. The air
seemed hot and heavy; and it was full of rustlings, creakings, and a murmur like
voices passing. I think that hundreds more of the Huorns must have been passing by
to help in the battle. Later there was a great rumble of thunder away south, and
flashes of lightning far away across Rohan. Every now and then we could see
mountain-peaks, miles and miles away, stab out suddenly, black and white, and then
vanish. And behind us there were noises like thunder in hills, but different. At times
the whole valley echoed.
 'It must have been about midnight when the Ents broke the dams and poured all
the gathered waters through a gap in the northern wall, down into Isengard. The
 115
Huorn-dark had passed, and the thunder had rolled away. The Moon was sinking
behind the western mountains.
 'Isengard began to fill up with black creeping streams and pools. They glittered in
the last light of the Moon, as they spread over the plain. Every now and then the
waters found their way down into some shaft or spouthole. Great white steams
hissed up. Smoke rose in billows. There were explosions and gusts of fire. One great
coil of vapour went whirling up, twisting round and round Orthanc, until it looked like
a tall peak of cloud, fiery underneath and moonlit above. And still more water poured
in, until at last Isengard looked like a huge flat saucepan, all steaming and bubbling.'
 'We saw a cloud of smoke and steam from the south last night when we came to
the mouth of Nan Curunir,' said Aragorn. 'We feared that Saruman was brewing
some new devilry for us.'
 'Not he!' said Pippin. 'He was probably choking and not laughing any more. By the
morning, yesterday morning, the water had sunk down into all the holes, and there
was a dense fog. We took refuge in that guardroom over there; and we had rather a
fright. The lake began to overflow and pour out through the old tunnel, and the water
was rapidly rising up the steps. We thought we were going to get caught like Orcs in
a hole; but we found a winding stair at the back of the store-room that brought us out
on top of the arch. It was a squeeze to get out, as the passages had been cracked
and half blocked with fallen stone near the top. There we sat high up above the
floods and watched the drowning of Isengard. The Ents kept on pouring in more
water, till all the fires were quenched and every cave filled. The fogs slowly gathered
together and steamed up into a huge umbrella of cloud: it must have been a mile
high. In the evening there was a great rainbow over the eastern hills; and then the
sunset was blotted out by a thick drizzle on the mountain-sides. It all went very quiet.
A few wolves howled mournfully, far away. The Ents stopped the inflow in the night,
and sent the Isen back into its old course. And that was the end of it all.
 'Since then the water has been sinking again. There must be outlets somewhere
from the caves underneath, I think. If Saruman peeps out of any of his windows, it
must look an untidy, dreary mess. We felt very lonely. Not even a visible Ent to talk
to in all the ruin; and no news. We spent the night up on top there above the arch,
and it was cold and damp and we did not sleep. We had a feeling that anything might
happen at any minute. Saruman is still in his tower. There was a noise in the night
like a wind coming up the valley. I think the Ents and Huorns that had been away
came back then; but where they have all gone to now, I don't know. It was a misty,
moisty morning when we climbed down and looked round again, and nobody was
about. And that is about all there is to tell. It seems almost peaceful now after all the
turmoil. And safer too, somehow, since Gandalf came back. I could sleep!'
 They all fell silent for a while. Gimli re-filled his pipe. 'There is one thing I wonder
about,' he said as he lit it with his flint and tinder: 'Wormtongue. You told Theoden he
was with Saruman. How did he get there?'
 'Oh yes, I forgot about him,' said Pippin. 'He did not get here till this morning. We
had just lit the fire and had some breakfast when Treebeard appeared again. We
heard him hooming and calling our names outside.
 '"I have just come round to see how you are faring, my lads,' he said, 'and to give
you some news. Huorns have come back. All's well; aye very well indeed!" he
laughed, and slapped his thighs. "No more Orcs in Isengard, no more axes! And
there will be folk coming up from the South before the day is old; some that you may
be glad to see."
 'He had hardly said that, when we heard the sound of hoofs on the road. We
 116
rushed out before the gates, and I stood and stared, half expecting to see Strider
and Gandalf come riding up at the head of an army. But out of the mist there rode a
man on an old tired horse; and he looked a queer twisted sort of creature himself.
There was no one else. When he came out of the mist and suddenly saw all the ruin
and wreckage in front of him, he sat and gaped, and his face went almost green. He
was so bewildered that he did not seem to notice us at first. When he did, he gave a
cry, and tried to turn his horse round and ride off. But Treebeard took three strides,
put out a long arm, and lifted him out of the saddle. His horse bolted in terror, and he
grovelled on the ground. He said he was Grima, friend and counsellor of the king,
and had been sent with important messages from Theoden to Saruman.
 '"No one else would dare to ride through the open land, so full of foul Orcs," he
said, "so I was sent. And I have had a perilous journey, and I am hungry and weary. I
fled far north out of my way, pursued by wolves."
 'I caught the sidelong looks he gave to Treebeard, and I said to myself "liar".
Treebeard looked at him in his long slow way for several minutes, till the wretched
man was squirming on the floor. Then at last he said: "Ha, hm, I was expecting you,
Master Wormtongue." The man started at that name. "Gandalf got here first. So I
know as much about you as I need, and I know what to do with you. Put all the rats
in one trap, said Gandalf; and I will. I am the master of Isengard now, but Saruman is
locked in his tower; and you can go there and give him all the messages that you
can think of."
 '"Let me go, let me go!" said Wormtongue. "I know the way."
 '"You knew the way, I don't doubt," said Treebeard. "But things have changed here
a little. Go and see!"
 'He let Wormtongue go, and he limped off through the arch with us close behind,
until he came inside the ring and could see all the floods that lay between him and
Orthanc. Then he turned to us.
 '"Let me go away!" he whined. "Let me go away! My messages are useless now."
 '"They are indeed," said Treebeard. "But you have only two choices: to stay with
me until Gandalf and your master arrive; or to cross the water. Which will you have?"
 'The man shivered at the mention of his master, and put a foot into the water; but
he drew back. "I cannot swim," he said.
 '"The water is not deep," said Treebeard. "It is dirty, but that will not harm you,
Master Wormtongue. In you go now!"
 'With that the wretch floundered off into the flood. It rose up nearly to his neck
before he got too far away for me to see him. The last I saw of him was clinging to
some old barrel or piece of wood. But Treebeard waded after him, and watched his
progress.
 '"Well, he has gone in," he said when he returned. "I saw him crawling up the steps
like a draggled rat. There is someone in the tower still: a hand came out and pulled
him in. So there he is, and I hope the welcome is to his liking. Now I must go and
wash myself clean of the slime. I'll be away up on the north side, if anyone wants to
see me. There is no clean water down here fit for an Ent to drink or to bathe in. So I
will ask you two lads to keep a watch at the gate for the folk that are coming. There'll
be the Lord of the Fields of Rohan, mark you! You must welcome him as well as you
know how: his men have fought a great fight with the Orcs. Maybe, you know the
right fashion of Men's words for such a lord, better than Ents. There have been many
lords in the green fields in my time, and I have never learned their speech or their
names. They will be wanting man-food, and you know all about that, I guess. So find
what you think is fit for a king to eat, if you can." And that is the end of the story.
 117
Though I should like to know who this Wormtongue is. Was he really the king's
counsellor?'
 'He was,' said Aragorn; 'and also Saruman's spy and servant in Rohan. Fate has
not been kinder to him than he deserves. The sight of the ruin of all that he thought
so strong and magnificent must have been almost punishment enough. But I fear
that worse awaits him.'
 'Yes, I don't suppose Treebeard sent him to Orthanc out of kindness,' said Merry.
'He seemed rather grimly delighted with the business and was laughing to himself
when he went to get his bathe and drink. We spent a busy time after that, searching
the flotsam, and rummaging about. We found two or three store-rooms in different
places nearby, above the flood-level. But Treebeard sent some Ents down, and they
carried off a great deal of the stuff.
 '"We want man-food for twenty-five," the Ents said, so you can see that somebody
had counted your company carefully before you arrived. You three were evidently
meant to go with the great people. But you would not have fared any better. We kept
as good as we sent, I promise you. Better, because we sent no drink.
 '"What about drink?" I said to the Ents.
 '"There is water of Isen," they said, "and that is good enough for Ents and Men."
But I hope that the Ents may have found time to brew some of their draughts from
the mountain-springs, and we shall see Gandalf's beard curling when he returns.
After the Ents had gone, we felt tired, and hungry. But we did not grumble – our
labours had been well rewarded. It was through our search for man-food that Pippin
discovered the prize of all the flotsam, those Hornblower barrels. "Pipe-weed is
better after food," said Pippin; that is how the situation arose.'
 'We understand it all perfectly now,' said Gimli.
 'All except one thing,' said Aragorn, 'leaf from the Southfarthing in Isengard. The
more I consider it, the more curious I find it. I have never been in Isengard, but I
have journeyed in this land, and I know well the empty countries that lie between
Rohan and the Shire. Neither goods nor folk have passed that way for many a long
year, not openly. Saruman had secret dealings with someone in the Shire, I guess.
Wormtongues may be found in other houses than King Theoden's. Was there a date
on the barrels?'
 'Yes,' said Pippin. 'It was the 1417 crop, that is last year's; no, the year before, of
course, now: a good year.'
 'Ah well, whatever evil was afoot is over now, I hope; or else it is beyond our reach
at present,' said Aragorn. 'Yet I think I shall mention it to Gandalf, small matter
though it may seem among his great affairs.'
 'I wonder what he is doing,' said Merry. 'The afternoon is getting on. Let us go and
look round! You can enter Isengard now at any rate, Strider, if you want to. But it is
not a very cheerful sight.'
Chapter 10
The Voice of Saruman
 They passed through the ruined tunnel and stood upon a heap of stones, gazing at
the dark rock of Orthanc, and its many windows, a menace still in the desolation that
lay all about it. The waters had now nearly all subsided. Here and there gloomy
pools remained, covered with scum and wreckage; but most of the wide circle was
bare again, a wilderness of slime and tumbled rock, pitted with blackened holes, and
dotted with posts and pillars leaning drunkenly this way and that. At the rim of the
 118
shattered bowl there lay vast mounds and slopes, like the shingles cast up by a great
storm; and beyond them the green and tangled valley ran up into the long ravine
between the dark arms of the mountains. Across the waste they saw riders picking
their way; they were coming from the north side, and already they were drawing near
to Orthanc.
 'There is Gandalf, and Theoden and his men!' said Legolas. 'Let us go and meet
them!'
 'Walk warily!' said Merry. 'There are loose slabs that may tilt up and throw you
down into a pit, if you don't take care.'
 They followed what was left of the road from the gates to Orthanc, going slowly, for
the flag-stones were cracked and slimed. The riders, seeing them approach, halted
under the shadow of the rock and waited for them. Gandalf rode forward to meet
them.
 'Well, Treebeard and I have had some interesting discussions, and made a few
plans,' he said, 'and we have all had some much-needed rest. Now we must be
going on again. I hope you companions have all rested, too, and refreshed
yourselves?'
 'We have,' said Merry. 'But our discussions began and ended in smoke. Still we
feel less ill-disposed towards Saruman than we did.'
 'Do you indeed?' said Gandalf. 'Well, I do not. I have now a last task to do before I
go: I must pay Saruman a farewell visit. Dangerous, and probably useless; but it
must be done. Those of you who wish may come with me – but beware! And do not
jest! This is not the time for it.'
 'I will come,' said Gimli. 'I wish to see him and learn if he really looks like you.'
 'And how will you learn that, Master Dwarf?' said Gandalf. 'Saruman could look like
me in your eyes, if it suited his purpose with you. And are you yet wise enough to
detect all his counterfeits? Well, we shall see, perhaps. He may be shy of showing
himself before many different eyes together. But I have ordered all the Ents to
remove themselves from sight, so perhaps we shall persuade him to come out.'
 'What's the danger?' asked Pippin. 'Will he shoot at us, and pour fire out of the
windows; or can he put a spell on us from a distance?'
 'The last is most likely, if you ride to his door with a light heart,' said Gandalf. 'But
there is no knowing what he can do, or may choose to try. A wild beast cornered is
not safe to approach. And Saruman has powers you do not guess. Beware of his
voice!'
 They came now to the foot of Orthanc. It was black, and the rock gleamed as if it
were wet. The many faces of the stone had sharp edges as though they had been
newly chiselled. A few scorings, and small flake-like splinters near the base, were all
the marks that it bore of the fury of the Ents.
 On the eastern side, in the angle of two piers, there was a great door, high above
the ground; and over it was a shuttered window, opening upon a balcony hedged
with iron bars. Up to the threshold of the door there mounted a flight of twenty-seven
broad stairs, hewn by some unknown art of the same black stone. This was the only
entrance to the tower; but many tall windows were cut with deep embrasures in the
climbing walls: far up they peered like little eyes in the sheer faces of the horns.
 119
 At the foot of the stairs Gandalf and the king dismounted. 'I will go up,' said
Gandalf. 'I have been in Orthanc and I know my peril.'
 'And I too will go up,' said the king. 'I am old, and fear no peril any more. I wish to
speak with the enemy who has done me so much wrong. Eomer shall come with me,
and see that my aged feet do not falter.'
 'As you will,' said Gandalf. 'Aragorn shall come with me. Let the others await us at
the foot of the stairs. They will hear and see enough, if there is anything to hear or
see.'
 'Nay!' said Gimli. 'Legolas and I wish for a closer view. We alone here represent
our kindred. We also will come behind.'
 'Come then!' said Gandalf, and with that he climbed the steps, and Theoden went
beside him.
 The Riders of Rohan sat uneasily upon their horses, on either side of the stair, and
looked up darkly at the great tower, fearing what might befall their lord. Merry and
Pippin sat on the bottom step, feeling both unimportant and unsafe.
 'Half a sticky mile from here to the gate!' muttered Pippin. 'I wish I could slip off
back to the guardroom unnoticed! What did we come for? We are not wanted.'
 Gandalf stood before the door of Orthanc and beat on it with his staff. It rang with a
hollow sound. 'Saruman, Saruman!' he cried in a loud commanding voice. 'Saruman
come forth!'
 For some time there was no answer. At last the window above the door was
unbarred, but no figure could be seen at its dark opening.
 'Who is it?' said a voice. 'What do you wish?'
 Theoden started. 'I know that voice,' he said, 'and I curse the day when I first
listened to it.'
 'Go and fetch Saruman, since you have become his footman, Grima Wormtongue!'
said Gandalf. 'And do not waste our time!'
 The window closed. They waited. Suddenly another voice spoke, low and
melodious, its very sound an enchantment. Those who listened unwarily to that voice
could seldom report the words that they heard; and if they did, they wondered, for
little power remained in them. Mostly they remembered only that it was a delight to
hear the voice speaking, all that it said seemed wise and reasonable, and desire
awoke in them by swift agreement to seem wise themselves. When others spoke
 120
they seemed harsh and uncouth by contrast; and if they gainsaid the voice, anger
was kindled in the hearts of those under the spell. For some the spell lasted only
while the voice spoke to them, and when it spake to another they smiled, as men do
who see through a juggler's trick while others gape at it. For many the sound of the
voice alone was enough to hold them enthralled; but for those whom it conquered
the spell endured when they were far away, and ever they heard that soft voice
whispering and urging them. But none were unmoved; none rejected its pleas and its
commands without an effort of mind and will, so long as its master had control of it.
 'Well?' it said now with gentle question. 'Why must you disturb my rest? Will you
give me no peace at all by night or day?' Its tone was that of a kindly heart aggrieved
by injuries undeserved.
 They looked up, astonished, for they had heard no sound of his coming; and they
saw a figure standing at the rail, looking down upon them: an old man, swathed in a
great cloak, the colour of which was not easy to tell, for it changed if they moved
their eyes or if he stirred. His face was long, with a high forehead, he had deep
darkling eyes, hard to fathom, though the look that they now bore was grave and
benevolent, and a little weary. His hair and beard were white, but strands of black
still showed about his lips and ears.
 'Like, and yet unlike,' muttered Gimli.
 'But come now,' said the soft voice. 'Two at least of you I know by name. Gandalf I
know too well to have much hope that he seeks help or counsel here. But you,
Theoden Lord of the Mark of Rohan are declared by your noble devices, and still
more by the fair countenance of the House of Eorl. O worthy son of Thengel the
Thrice-renowned! Why have you not come before, and as a friend? Much have I
desired to see you, mightiest king of western lands, and especially in these latter
years, to save you from the unwise and evil counsels that beset you! Is it yet too
late? Despite the injuries that have been done to me, in which the men of Rohan,
alas! have had some part, still I would save you, and deliver you from the ruin that
draws nigh inevitably, if you ride upon this road which you have taken. Indeed I alone
can aid you now.'
 Theoden opened his mouth as if to speak, but he said nothing. He looked up at the
face of Saruman with its dark solemn eyes bent down upon him, and then to Gandalf
at his side; and he seemed to hesitate. Gandalf made no sign; but stood silent as
stone, as one waiting patiently for some call that has not yet come. The Riders
stirred at first, murmuring with approval of the words of Saruman; and then they too
were silent, as men spell-bound. It seemed to them that Gandalf had never spoken
so fair and fittingly to their lord. Rough and proud now seemed all his dealings with
Theoden. And over their hearts crept a shadow, the fear of a great danger: the end
of the Mark in a darkness to which Gandalf was driving them, while Saruman stood
beside a door of escape, holding it half open so that a ray of light came through.
There was a heavy silence.
 It was Gimli the dwarf who broke in suddenly. 'The words of this wizard stand on
their heads,' he growled, gripping the handle of his axe. 'In the language of Orthanc
help means ruin, and saving means slaying, that is plain. But we do not come here to
beg.'
 'Peace!' said Saruman, and for a fleeting moment his voice was less suave, and a
light flickered in his eyes and was gone. 'I do not speak to you yet, Gimli Gloin's son,'
he said. 'Far away is your home and small concern of yours are the troubles of this
land. But it was not by design of your own that you became embroiled in them, and
so I will not blame such part as you have played – a valiant one, I doubt not. But I
 121
pray you, allow me first to speak with the King of Rohan, my neighbour, and once my
friend.
 'What have you to say, Theoden King? Will you have peace with me, and all the
aid that my knowledge, founded in long years, can bring? Shall we make our
counsels together against evil days, and repair our injuries with such good will that
our estates shall both come to fairer flower than ever before?'
 Still Theoden did not answer. Whether he strove with anger or doubt none could
say. Eomer spoke.
 'Lord, hear me!' he said. 'Now we feel the peril that we were warned of. Have we
ridden forth to victory, only to stand at last amazed by an old liar with honey on his
forked tongue? So would the trapped wolf speak to the hounds, if he could. What aid
can he give to you, forsooth? All he desires is to escape from his plight. But will you
parley with this dealer in treachery and murder? Remember Theodred at the Fords,
and the grave of Hama in Helm's Deep!'
 'If we speak of poisoned tongues what shall we say of yours, young serpent?' said
Saruman, and the flash of his anger was now plain to see. 'But come, Eomer,
Eomund's son!' he went on in his soft voice again. 'To every man his part. Valour in
arms is yours, and you win high honour thereby. Slay whom your lord names as
enemies, and be content. Meddle not in policies which you do not understand. But
maybe, if you become a king, you will find that he must choose his friends with care.
The friendship of Saruman and the power of Orthanc cannot be lightly thrown aside,
whatever grievances, real or fancied, may lie behind. You have won a battle but not
a war and that with help on which you cannot count again. You may find the Shadow
of the Wood at your own door next: it is wayward, and senseless, and has no love for
Men.
 'But my lord of Rohan, am I to be called a murderer, because valiant men have
fallen in battle? If you go to war, needlessly, for I did not desire it, then men will be
slain. But if I am a murderer on that account, then all the House of Eorl is stained
with murder; for they have fought many wars, and assailed many who defied them.
Yet with some they have afterwards made peace, none the worse for being politic. I
say, Theoden King: shall we have peace and friendship, you and I? It is ours to
command.'
 'We will have peace,' said Theoden at last thickly and with an effort. Several of the
Riders cried out gladly. Theoden held up his hand. 'Yes, we will have peace,' he
said, now in a clear voice, 'we will have peace, when you and all your works have
perished – and the works of your dark master to whom you would deliver us. You are
a liar, Saruman, and a corrupter of men's hearts. You hold out your hand to me, and
I perceive only a finger of the claw of Mordor. Cruel and cold! Even if your war on me
was just as it was not, for were you ten times as wise you would have no right to rule
me and mine for your own profit as you desired – even so, what will you say of your
torches in Westfold and the children that lie dead there? And they hewed Hama's
body before the gates of the Hornburg, after he was dead. When you hang from a
gibbet at your window for the sport of your own crows, I will have peace with you and
Orthanc. So much for the House of Eorl. A lesser son of great sires am I, but I do not
need to lick your fingers. Turn elsewhither. But I fear your voice has lost its charm.'
 The Riders gazed up at Theoden like men startled out of a dream. Harsh as an old
raven's their master's voice sounded in their ears after the music of Saruman. But
Saruman for a while was beside himself with wrath. He leaned over the rail as if he
would smite the King with his staff. To some suddenly it seemed that they saw a
snake coiling itself to strike.
 122
 'Gibbets and crows!' he hissed, and they shuddered at the hideous change.
'Dotard! What is the house of Eorl but a thatched barn where brigands drink in the
reek, and their brats roll on the floor among the dogs? Too long have they escaped
the gibbet themselves. But the noose comes, slow in the drawing, tight and hard in
the end. Hang if you will!' Now his voice changed, as he slowly mastered himself. 'I
know not why I have had the patience to speak to you. For I need you not, nor your
little band of gallopers, as swift to fly as to advance, Theoden Horsemaster. Long
ago I offered you a state beyond your merit and your wit. I have offered it again, so
that those whom you mislead may clearly see the choice of roads. You give me brag
and abuse. So be it. Go back to your huts!
 'But you, Gandalf! For you at least I am grieved, feeling for your shame. How
comes it that you can endure such company? For you are proud, Gandalf – and not
without reason, having a noble mind and eyes that look both deep and far. Even now
will you not listen to my counsel?'
 Gandalf stirred, and looked up. 'What have you to say that you did not say at our
last meeting?' he asked. 'Or, perhaps, you have things to unsay?'
 Saruman paused. 'Unsay?' he mused, as if puzzled. 'Unsay? I endeavoured to
advise you for your own good, but you scarcely listened. You are proud and do not
love advice, having indeed a store of your own wisdom. But on that occasion you
erred, I think, misconstruing my intentions wilfully. I fear that in my eagerness to
persuade you, I lost patience. And indeed I regret it. For I bore you no ill-will; and
even now I bear none, though you return to me in the company of the violent and the
ignorant. How should I? Are we not both members of a high and ancient order, most
excellent in Middle-earth? Our friendship would profit us both alike. Much we could
still accomplish together, to heal the disorders of the world. Let us understand one
another, and dismiss from thought these lesser folk! Let them wait on our decisions!
For the common good I am willing to redress the past, and to receive you. Will you
not consult with me? Will you not come up?'
 So great was the power that Saruman exerted in this last effort that none that
stood within hearing were unmoved. But now the spell was wholly different. They
heard the gentle remonstrance of a kindly king with an erring but much-loved
minister. But they were shut out, listening at a door to words not meant for them: illmannered children
or stupid servants overhearing the elusive discourse of their
elders, and wondering how it would affect their lot. Of loftier mould these two were
made: reverend and wise. It was inevitable that they should make alliance. Gandalf
would ascend into the tower, to discuss deep things beyond their comprehension in
the high chambers of Orthanc. The door would be closed, and they would be left
outside, dismissed to await allotted work or punishment. Even in the mind of
Theoden the thought took shape, like a shadow of doubt: 'He will betray us; he will
go – we shall be lost.'
 Then Gandalf laughed. The fantasy vanished like a puff of smoke.
 'Saruman, Saruman!' said Gandalf still laughing. 'Saruman, you missed your path
in life. You should have been the king's jester and earned your bread, and stripes
too, by mimicking his counsellors. Ah me!' he paused, getting the better of his mirth.
'Understand one another? I fear I am beyond your comprehension. But you,
Saruman, I understand now too well. I keep a clearer memory of your arguments,
and deeds, than you suppose. When last I visited you, you were the jailor of Mordor,
and there I was to be sent. Nay, the guest who has escaped from the roof, will think
twice before he comes back in by the door. Nay, I do not think I will come up. But
listen, Saruman, for the last time! Will you not come down? Isengard has proved less
 123
strong than your hope and fancy made it. So may other things in which you still have
trust. Would it not be well to leave it for a while? To turn to new things, perhaps?
Think well, Saruman! Will you not come down?'
 A shadow passed over Saruman's face; then it went deathly white. Before he could
conceal it, they saw through the mask the anguish of a mind in doubt, loathing to
stay and dreading to leave its refuge. For a second he hesitated, and no one
breathed. Then he spoke, and his voice was shrill and cold. Pride and hate were
conquering him.
 'Will I come down?' he mocked. 'Does an unarmed man come down to speak with
robbers out of doors? I can hear you well enough here. I am no fool, and I do not
trust you, Gandalf. They do not stand openly on my stairs, but I know where the wild
wood-demons are lurking, at your command.'
 'The treacherous are ever distrustful,' answered Gandalf wearily. 'But you need not
fear for your skin. I do not wish to kill you, or hurt you, as you would know, if you
really understood me. And I have the power to protect you. I am giving you a last
chance. You can leave Orthanc, free – if you choose.'
 'That sounds well,' sneered Saruman. 'Very much in the manner of Gandalf the
Grey: so condescending, and so very kind. I do not doubt that you would find
Orthanc commodious, and my departure convenient. But why should I wish to leave?
And what do you mean by 'free'? There are conditions, I presume?'
 'Reasons for leaving you can see from your windows,' answered Gandalf. 'Others
will occur to your thought. Your servants are destroyed and scattered; your
neighbours you have made your enemies; and you have cheated your new master,
or tried to do so. When his eye turns hither, it will be the red eye of wrath. But when I
say 'free', I mean 'free': free from bond, of chain or command; to go where you will,
even, even to Mordor, Saruman, if you desire. But you will first surrender to me the
Key of Orthanc, and your staff. They shall be pledges of your conduct, to be returned
later, if you merit them.'
 Saruman's face grew livid, twisted with rage, and a red light was kindled in his
eyes. He laughed wildly. 'Later!' he cried, and his voice rose to a scream. 'Later! Yes,
when you also have the Keys of Barad-dur itself, I suppose; and the crowns of seven
kings, and the rods of the Five Wizards, and have purchased yourself a pair of boots
many sizes larger than those that you wear now. A modest plan. Hardly one in which
my help is needed! I have other things to do. Do not be a fool. If you wish to treat
with me, while you have a chance, go away, and come back when you are sober!
And leave behind these cut-throats and small rag-tag that dangle at your tail! Good
day!' He turned and left the balcony.
 'Come back, Saruman!' said Gandalf in a commanding voice. To the amazement of
the others, Saruman turned again, and as if dragged against his will, he came slowly
back to the iron rail, leaning on it, breathing hard. His face was lined and shrunken.
His hand clutched his heavy black staff like a claw.
 'I did not give you leave to go,' said Gandalf sternly. 'I have not finished. You have
become a fool, Saruman, and yet pitiable. You might still have turned away from folly
and evil, and have been of service. But you choose to stay and gnaw the ends of
your old plots. Stay then! But I warn you: you will not easily come out again. Not
unless the dark hands of the East stretch out to take you, Saruman!' he cried, and
his voice grew in power and authority. 'Behold, I am not Gandalf the Grey, whom you
betrayed. I am Gandalf the White, who has returned from death. You have no colour
now, and I cast you from the order and from the Council.'
 He raised his hand, and spoke slowly in a clear cold voice. 'Saruman, your staff is
 124
broken.' There was a crack, and the staff split asunder in Saruman's hand, and the
head of it fell down at Gandalf's feet. 'Go!' said Gandalf. With a cry Saruman fell back
and crawled away. At that moment a heavy shining thing came hurtling down from
above. It glanced off the iron rail, even as Saruman left it, and passing close to
Gandalf's head, it smote the stair on which he stood. The rail rang and snapped. The
stair cracked and splintered in glittering sparks. But the ball was unharmed: it rolled
on down the steps, a globe of crystal, dark, but glowing with a heart of fire. As it
bounded away towards a pool Pippin ran after it and picked it up.
 'The murderous rogue!' cried Eomer. But Gandalf was unmoved. No, that was not
thrown by Saruman, he said, nor even at his bidding, I think. It came from a window
far above. A parting shot from Master Wormtongue, I fancy, but ill aimed.'
 'The aim was poor, maybe, because he could not make up his mind which he
hated more, you or Saruman,' said Aragorn.
 'That may be so,' said Gandalf. 'Small comfort will those two have in their
companionship: they will gnaw one another with words. But the punishment is just. If
Wormtongue ever comes out of Orthanc alive, it will be more than he deserves.
 'Here, my lad, I'll take that! I did not ask you to handle it,' he cried, turning sharply
and seeing Pippin coming up the steps, slowly, as if he were bearing a great weight.
He went down to meet him and hastily took the dark globe from the hobbit, wrapping
it in the folds of his cloak. 'I will take care of this,' he said. 'It is not a thing, I guess,
that Saruman would have chosen to cast away.'
 'But he may have other things to cast,' said Gimli. 'If that is the end of the debate,
let us go out of stone's throw, at least!'
 'It is the end,' said Gandalf. 'Let us go.'
 They turned their backs on the doors of Orthanc, and went down. The riders hailed
the king with joy, and saluted Gandalf. The spell of Saruman was broken: they had
seen him come at call, and crawl away, dismissed.
 'Well, that is done,' said Gandalf. 'Now I must find Treebeard and tell him how
things have gone.'
 'He will have guessed, surely?' said Merry. 'Were they likely to end any other way?'
 'Not likely,' answered Gandalf, 'though they came to the balance of a hair. But I
had reasons for trying; some merciful and some less so. First Saruman was shown
that the power of his voice was waning. He cannot be both tyrant and counsellor.
When the plot is ripe it remains no longer secret. Yet he fell into the trap, and tried to
deal with his victims piece-meal, while others listened. Then I gave him a last choice
and a fair one: to renounce both Mordor and his private schemes, and make amends
by helping us in our need. He knows our need, none better. Great service he could
have rendered. But he has chosen to withhold it, and keep the power of Orthanc. He
will not serve, only command. He lives now in terror of the shadow of Mordor, and
yet he still dreams of riding the storm. Unhappy fool! He will be devoured, if the
power of the East stretches out its arms to Isengard. We cannot destroy Orthanc
from without, but Sauron – who knows what he can do?'
 'And what if Sauron does not conquer? What will you do to him?' asked Pippin.
 'I? Nothing!' said Gandalf. 'I will do nothing to him. I do not wish for mastery. What
will become of him? I cannot say. I grieve that so much that was good now festers in
the tower. Still for us things have not gone badly. Strange are the turns of fortune!
Often does hatred hurt itself! I guess that, even if we had entered in, we could have
found few treasures in Orthanc more precious than the thing which Wormtongue
threw down at us.'
 A shrill shriek, suddenly cut off, came from an open window high above.
 125
 'It seems that Saruman thinks so too,' said Gandalf. 'Let us leave them!'
 They returned now to the ruins of the gate. Hardly had they passed out under the
arch, when, from among the shadows of the piled stones where they had stood,
Treebeard and a dozen other Ents came striding up. Aragorn, Gimli and Legolas
gazed at them in wonder.
 'Here are three of my companions, Treebeard,' said Gandalf. 'I have spoken of
them, but you have not yet seen them.' He named them one by one.
 The Old Ent looked at them long and searchingly, and spoke to them in turn. Last
he turned to Legolas. 'So you have come all the way from Mirkwood, my good Elf? A
very great forest it used to be!'
 'And still is,' said Legolas. 'But not so great that we who dwell there ever tire of
seeing new trees. I should dearly love to journey in Fangorn's Wood. I scarcely
passed beyond the eaves of it, and I did not wish to turn back.'
 Treebeard's eyes gleamed with pleasure. 'I hope you may have your wish, ere the
hills be much older,' he said.
 'I will come, if I have the fortune,' said Legolas. 'I have made a bargain with my
friend that, if all goes well, we will visit Fangorn together – by your leave.'
 'Any Elf that comes with you will be welcome,' said Treebeard.
 'The friend I speak of is not an Elf,' said Legolas, 'I mean Gimli, Gloin's son here.'
Gimli bowed low, and the axe slipped from his belt and clattered on the ground.
 'Hoom, hm! Ah now,' said Treebeard, looking dark-eyed at him. 'A dwarf and an
axe-bearer! Hoom! I have good will to Elves; but you ask much. This is a strange
friendship!'
 'Strange it may seem,' said Legolas, 'but while Gimli lives I shall not come to
Fangorn alone. His axe is not for trees, but for orc-necks, O Fangorn, Master of
Fangorn's Wood. Forty-two he hewed in the battle.'
 'Hoo! Come now!' said Treebeard. 'That is a better story! Well, well, things will go
as they will; and there is no need to hurry to meet them. But now we must part for a
while. Day is drawing to an end, yet Gandalf says you must go ere nightfall, and the
Lord of the Mark is eager for his own house.'
 'Yes, we must go, and go now,' said Gandalf. 'I fear that I must take your
gatekeepers from you. But you will manage well enough without them.'
 'Maybe I shall,' said Treebeard. 'But I shall miss them. We have become friends in
so short a while that I think I must be getting hasty – growing backwards towards
youth, perhaps. But there, they are the first new thing under Sun or Moon that I have
seen for many a long, long day. I shall not forget them. I have put their names into
the Long List. Ents will remember it.
Ents the earthborn, old as mountains,
the wide-walkers, water drinking;
and hungry as hunters, the Hobbit children,
the laughing-folk, the little people,
 they shall remain friends as long as leaves are renewed. Fare you well! But if you
hear news up in your pleasant land, in the Shire, send me word! You know what I
mean: word or sight of the Entwives. Come yourselves if you can!'
 'We will!' said Merry and Pippin together, and they turned away hastily. Treebeard
looked at them, and was silent for a while, shaking his head thoughtfully. Then he
turned to Gandalf.
 'So Saruman would not leave?' he said. 'I did not think he would. His heart is as
 126
rotten as a black Huorn's. Still, if I were overcome and all my trees destroyed, I
would not come while I had one dark hole left to hide in.'
 'No,' said Gandalf. 'But you have not plotted to cover all the world with your trees
and choke all other living things. But there it is, Saruman remains to nurse his hatred
and weave again such webs as he can. He has the Key of Orthanc. But he must not
be allowed to escape.'
 'Indeed no! Ents will see to that,' said Treebeard. 'Saruman shall not set foot
beyond the rock, without my leave. Ents will watch over him.'
 'Good!' said Gandalf. 'That is what I hoped. Now I can go and turn to other matters
with one care the less. But you must be wary. The waters have gone down. It will not
be enough to put sentinels round the tower, I fear. I do not doubt that there were
deep ways delved under Orthanc, and that Saruman hopes to go and come
unmarked, before long. If you will undertake the labour, I beg you to pour in the
waters again; and do so, until Isengard remains a standing pool, or you discover the
outlets. When all the underground places are drowned, and the outlets blocked, then
Saruman must stay upstairs and look out of the windows.'
 'Leave it to the Ents!' said Treebeard. 'We shall search the valley from head to foot
and peer under every pebble. Trees are coming back to live here, old trees, wild
trees. The Watchwood we will call it. Not a squirrel will go here, but I shall know of it.
Leave it to Ents! Until seven times the years in which he tormented us have passed,
we shall not tire of watching him.'
Chapter 11
The Palantir
 The sun was sinking behind the long western arm of the mountains when Gandalf
and his companions, and the king with his Riders, set out again from Isengard.
Gandalf took Merry behind him, and Aragorn took Pippin. Two of the king's men went
on ahead, riding swiftly, and passed soon out of sight down into the valley. The
others followed at an easy pace.
 Ents in a solemn row stood like statues at the gate, with their long arms uplifted,
but they made no sound. Merry and Pippin looked back, when they had passed
some way down the winding road. Sunlight was still shining in the sky, but long
shadows reached over Isengard: grey ruins falling into darkness. Treebeard stood
alone there now, like the distant stump of an old tree: the hobbits thought of their first
meeting, upon the sunny ledge far away on the borders of Fangorn.
 They came to the pillar of the White Hand. The pillar was still standing, but the
graven hand had been thrown down and broken into small pieces. Right in the
middle of the road the long forefinger lay, white in the dusk, its red nail darkening to
black.
 'The Ents pay attention to every detail!' said Gandalf.
 They rode on, and evening deepened in the valley.
 'Are we riding far tonight, Gandalf?' asked Merry after a while. 'I don't know how
you feel with small rag-tag dangling behind you; but the rag-tag is tired and will be
glad to stop dangling and lie down.'
 'So you heard that?' said Gandalf. 'Don't let it rankle! Be thankful no longer words
were aimed at you. He had his eyes on you. If it is any comfort to your pride, I should
say that, at the moment, you and Pippin are more in his thoughts than all the rest of
us. Who you are; how you came there, and why; what you know; whether you were
captured, and if so, how you escaped when all the Orcs perished – it is with those
 127
little riddles that the great mind of Saruman is troubled. A sneer from him, Meriadoc,
is a compliment, if you feel honoured by his concern.'
 'Thank you!' said Merry. 'But it is a greater honour to dangle at your tail, Gandalf.
For one thing, in that position one has a chance of putting a question a second time.
Are we riding far tonight?'
 Gandalf laughed. 'A most unquenchable hobbit! All Wizards should have a hobbit
or two in their care – to teach them the meaning of the word, and to correct them. I
beg your pardon. But I have given thought even to these simple matters. We will ride
for a few hours, gently, until we come to the end of the valley. Tomorrow we must
ride faster.
 'When we came, we meant to go straight from Isengard back to the king's house at
Edoras over the plains, a ride of some days. But we have taken thought and
changed the plan. Messengers have gone ahead to Helm's Deep, to warn them that
the king is returning tomorrow. He will ride from there with many men to Dunharrow
by paths among the hills. From now on no more than two or three together are to go
openly over the land, by day or night, when it can be avoided.'
 'Nothing or a double helping is your way!' said Merry. 'I am afraid I was not looking
beyond tonight's bed. Where and what are Helm's Deep and all the rest of it? I don't
know anything about this country.'
 'Then you'd best learn something, if you wish to understand what is happening. But
not just now, and not from me: I have too many pressing things to think about.'
 'All right, I'll tackle Strider by the camp-fire: he's less testy. But why all this
secrecy? I thought we'd won the battle!'
 'Yes, we have won, but only the first victory and that in itself increases our danger.
There was some link between Isengard and Mordor, which I have not yet fathomed.
How they exchanged news I am not sure; but they did so. The Eye of Barad-dur will
be looking impatiently towards the Wizard's Vale, I think; and towards Rohan. The
less it sees the better.'
 The road passed slowly, winding down the valley. Now further, and now nearer
Isen flowed in its stony bed. Night came down from the mountains. All the mists were
gone. A chill wind blew. The moon, now waxing round, filled the eastern sky with a
pale cold sheen. The shoulders of the mountain to their right sloped down to bare
hills. The wide plains opened grey before them.
 At last they halted. Then they turned aside, leaving the highway and taking to the
sweet upland turf again. Going westward a mile or so they came to a dale. It opened
southward, leaning back into the slope of round Dol Baran, the last hill of the
northern ranges, greenfooted, crowned with heather. The sides of the glen were
shaggy with last year's bracken, among which the tight-curled fronds of spring were
just thrusting through the sweet-scented earth. Thornbushes grew thick upon the low
banks, and under them they made their camp, two hours or so before the middle of
the night. They lit a fire in a hollow, down among the roots of a spreading hawthorn,
tall as a tree, writhen with age; but hale in every limb. Buds were swelling at each
twig's tip.
 Guards were set, two at a watch. The rest, after they had supped, wrapped
themselves in a cloak and blanket and slept. The hobbits lay in a corner by
themselves upon a pile of old bracken. Merry was sleepy, but Pippin now seemed
curiously restless. The bracken cracked and rustled, as he twisted and turned.
 'What's the matter?' asked Merry. 'Are you lying on an ant-hill?'
 'No,' said Pippin, 'but I'm not comfortable. I wonder how long it is since I slept in a
bed?'
 128
 Merry yawned. 'Work it out on your fingers!' he said. 'But you must know how long
it is since we left Lorien.'
 'Oh, that!' said Pippin. 'I mean a real bed in a bedroom.'
 'Well, Rivendell then,' said Merry. 'But I could sleep anywhere tonight.'
 'You had the luck, Merry,' said Pippin softly, after a long pause. 'You were riding
with Gandalf.'
 'Well, what of it?'
 'Did you get any news, any information out of him?'
 'Yes, a good deal. More than usual. But you heard it all or most of it: you were
close by, and we were talking no secrets. But you can go with him tomorrow, if you
think you can get more out of him – and if he'll have you.'
 'Can I? Good! But he's close, isn't he? Not changed at all.'
 'Oh yes, he is!' said Merry, waking up a little, and beginning to wonder what was
bothering his companion. 'He has grown, or something. He can be both kinder and
more alarming, merrier and more solemn than before, I think. He has changed; but
we have not had a chance to see how much, yet. But think of the last part of that
business with Saruman! Remember Saruman was once Gandalf's superior: head of
the Council, whatever that may be exactly. He was Saruman the White. Gandalf is
the White now. Saruman came when he was told, and his rod was taken; and then
he was just told to go, and he went!'
 'Well, if Gandalf has changed at all, then he's closer than ever that's all,' Pippin
argued. 'That-glass ball, now. He seemed mighty pleased with it. He knows or
guesses something about it. But does he tell us what? No, not a word. Yet I picked it
up, and I saved it from rolling into a pool. Here, I'll take that, my lad – that's all. I
wonder what it is? It felt so very heavy.' Pippin's voice fell very low as if he was
talking to himself.
 'Hullo!' said Merry. 'So that's what is bothering you? Now, Pippin my lad, don't
forget Gildor's saying – the one Sam used to quote: Do not meddle in the affairs of
Wizards, for they are subtle and quick to anger.'
 'But our whole life for months has been one long meddling in the affairs of
Wizards,' said Pippin. 'I should like a bit of information as well as danger. I should
like a look at that ball.'
 'Go to sleep!' said Merry. 'You'll get information enough, sooner or later. My dear
Pippin, no Took ever beat a Brandybuck for inquisitiveness; but is this the time, I ask
you?'
 'All right! What's the harm in my telling you what I should like: a look at that stone?
I know I can't have it, with old Gandalf sitting on it, like a hen on an egg. But it
doesn't help much to get no more from you than a you-can't-have-it-so-go-to-sleep!'
 'Well, what else could I say?' said Merry. 'I'm sorry, Pippin, but you really must wait
till the morning. I'll be as curious as you like after breakfast, and I'll help in any way I
can at wizard-wheedling. But I can't keep awake any longer. If I yawn any more, I
shall split at the ears. Good night!'
 Pippin said no more. He lay still now, but sleep remained far away; and it was not
encouraged by the sound of Merry breathing softly, asleep in a few minutes after
saying good night. The thought of the dark globe seemed to grow stronger as all
grew quiet. Pippin felt again its weight in his hands, and saw again the mysterious
red depths into which he had looked for a moment. He tossed and turned and tried to
think of something else.
 At last he could stand it no longer. He got up and looked round. It was chilly, and
he wrapped his cloak about him. The moon was shining cold and white, down into
 129
the dell, and the shadows of the bushes were black. All about lay sleeping shapes.
The two guards were not in view: they were up on the hill, perhaps, or hidden in the
bracken. Driven by some impulse that he did not understand, Pippin walked softly to
where Gandalf lay. He looked down at him. The wizard seemed asleep, but with lids
not fully closed: there was a glitter of eyes under his long lashes. Pippin stepped
back hastily. But Gandalf made no sign; and drawn forward once more, half against
his will, the hobbit crept up again from behind the wizard's head. He was rolled in a
blanket, with his cloak spread over the top; and close beside him, between his right
side and his bent arm, there was a hummock, something round wrapped in a dark
cloth; his hand seemed only just to have slipped off it to the ground.
 Hardly breathing, Pippin crept nearer, foot by foot. At last he knelt down. Then he
put his hands out stealthily, and slowly lifted the lump up: it did not seem quite so
heavy as he had expected. 'Only some bundle of oddments, perhaps, after all,' he
thought with a strange sense of relief; but he did not put the bundle down again. He
stood for a moment clasping it. Then an idea came into his mind. He tiptoed away,
found a large stone, and came back.
 Quickly now he drew off the cloth, wrapped the stone in it and kneeling down, laid
it back by the wizard's hand. Then at last he looked at the thing that he had
uncovered. There it was: a smooth globe of crystal, now dark and dead, lying bare
before his knees. Pippin lifted it, covered it hurriedly in his own cloak, and half turned
to go back to his bed. At that moment Gandalf moved in his sleep, and muttered
some words: they seemed to be in a strange tongue; his hand groped out and
clasped the wrapped stone, then he sighed and did not move again.
 'You idiotic fool!' Pippin muttered to himself. 'You're going to get yourself into
frightful trouble. Put it back quick!' But he found now that his knees quaked, and he
did not dare to go near enough to the wizard to reach the bundle. 'I'll never get it
back now without waking him,' he thought, 'not till I'm a bit calmer. So I may as well
have a look first. Not just here though!' He stole away, and sat down on a green
hillock not far from his bed. The moon looked in over the edge of the dell.
 Pippin sat with his knees drawn up and the ball between them. He bent low over it,
looking like a greedy child stooping over a bowl of food, in a corner away from
others. He drew his cloak aside and gazed at it. The air seemed still and tense about
him. At first the globe was dark, black as jet, with the moonlight gleaming on its
surface. Then there came a faint glow and stir in the heart of it, and it held his eyes,
so that now he could not look away. Soon all the inside seemed on fire; the ball was
spinning, or the lights within were revolving. Suddenly the lights went out. He gave a
gasp and struggled; but he remained bent, clasping the ball with both hands. Closer
and closer he bent, and then became rigid; his lips moved soundlessly for a while.
Then with a strangled cry he fell back and lay still.
 The cry was piercing. The guards leapt down from the banks. All the camp was
soon astir.
 'So this is the thief!' said Gandalf. Hastily he cast his cloak over the globe where it
lay. 'But you, Pippin! This is a grievous turn to things!' He knelt by Pippin's body: the
hobbit was lying on his back rigid, with unseeing eyes staring up at the sky. 'The
devilry! What mischief has he done – to himself, and to all of us?' The wizard's face
was drawn and haggard.
 He took Pippin's hand and bent over his face, listening for his breath; then he laid
his hands on his brow. The hobbit shuddered. His eyes closed. He cried out and sat
up, staring in bewilderment at all the faces round him, pale in the moonlight.
 'It is not for you, Saruman!' he cried in a shrill and toneless voice shrinking away
 130
from Gandalf. 'I will send for it at once. Do you understand? Say just that!' Then he
struggled to get up and escape but Gandalf held him gently and firmly.
 'Peregrin Took!' he said. 'Come back!'
 The hobbit relaxed and fell back, clinging to the wizard's hand. 'Gandalf!' he cried.
'Gandalf! Forgive me!'
 'Forgive you?' said the wizard. 'Tell me first what you have done!'
 'I, I took the ball and looked at it,' stammered Pippin, 'and I saw things that
frightened me. And I wanted to go away, but I couldn't. And then he came and
questioned me; and he looked at me, and, and that is all I remember.'
 'That won't do,' said Gandalf sternly. 'What did you see, and what did you say?'
 Pippin shut his eyes and shivered, but said nothing. They all stared at him in
silence, except Merry who turned away. But Gandalf's face was still hard. 'Speak!' he
said.
 In a low hesitating voice Pippin began again, and slowly his words grew clearer
and stronger. 'I saw a dark sky, and tall battlements,' he said. 'And tiny stars. It
seemed very far away and long ago, yet hard and clear. Then the stars went in and
out – they were cut off by things with wings. Very big, I think, really; but in the glass
they looked like bats wheeling round the tower. I thought there were nine of them.
One began to fly straight towards me, getting bigger and bigger. It had a horrible –
no, no! I can't say.
 'I tried to get away, because I thought it would fly out; but when it had covered all
the globe, it disappeared. Then he came. He did not speak so that I could hear
words. He just looked, and I understood.
 '"So you have come back? Why have you neglected to report for so long?"
 'I did not answer. He said: "Who are you?" I still did not answer, but it hurt me
horribly; and he pressed me, so I said: "A hobbit."
 'Then suddenly he seemed to see me, and he laughed at me. It was cruel. It was
like being stabbed with knives. I struggled. But he said: "Wait a moment! We shall
meet again soon. Tell Saruman that this dainty is not for him. I will send for it at
once. Do you understand? Say just that!"
 'Then he gloated over me. I felt I was falling to pieces. No, no! I can't say any
more. I don't remember anything else.'
 'Look at me!' said Gandalf.
 Pippin looked up straight into his eyes. The wizard held his gaze for a moment in
silence. Then his face grew gentler, and the shadow of a smile appeared. He laid his
hand softly on Pippin's head.
 'All right!' he said. 'Say no more! You have taken no harm. There is no lie in your
eyes, as I feared. But he did not speak long with you. A fool, but an honest fool, you
remain, Peregrin Took. Wiser ones might have done worse in such a pass. But mark
this! You have been saved, and all your friends too, mainly by good fortune, as it is
called. You cannot count on it a second time. If he had questioned you, then and
there, almost certainly you would have told all that you know, to the ruin of us all. But
he was too eager. He did not want information only: he wanted you, quickly, so that
he could deal with you in the Dark Tower, slowly. Don't shudder! If you will meddle in
the affairs of Wizards, you must be prepared to think of such things. But come! I
forgive you. Be comforted! Things have not turned out as evilly as they might.'
 He lifted Pippin gently and carried him back to his bed. Merry followed, and sat
down beside him. Lie there and rest, if you can, Pippin!' said Gandalf. 'Trust me. If
you feel an itch in your palms again, tell me of it! Such things can be cured. But
anyway, my dear hobbit, don't put a lump of rock under my elbow again! Now, I will
 131
leave you two together for a while.'
 With that Gandalf returned to the others, who were still standing by the Orthancstone in troubled
thought. 'Peril comes in the night when least expected,' he said.
'We have had a narrow escape!'
 'How is the hobbit, Pippin?' asked Aragorn.
 'I think all will be well now,' answered Gandalf. 'He was not held long, and hobbits
have an amazing power of recovery. The memory, or the horror of it, will probably
fade quickly. Too quickly, perhaps. Will you, Aragorn, take the Orthanc-stone and
guard it? It is a dangerous charge.'
 'Dangerous indeed, but not to all,' said Aragorn. 'There is one who may claim it by
right. For this assuredly is the palantir of Orthanc from the treasury of Elendil, set
here by the Kings of Gondor. Now my hour draws near. I will take it.'
 Gandalf looked at Aragorn, and then, to the surprise of the others, he lifted the
covered Stone, and bowed as he presented it.
 'Receive it, lord!' he said, 'in earnest of other things that shall be given back. But if I
may counsel you in the use of your own, do not use it – yet! Be wary!'
 'When have I been hasty or unwary, who have waited and prepared for so many
long years?' said Aragorn.
 'Never yet. Do not then stumble at the end of the road,' answered Gandalf. 'But at
the least keep this thing secret. You, and all others that stand here! The hobbit,
Peregrin, above all should not know where it is bestowed. The evil fit may come on
him again. For alas! he has handled it and looked in it, as should never have
happened. He ought never to have touched it in Isengard, and there I should have
been quicker. But my mind was bent on Saruman, and I did not at once guess the
nature of the Stone. Then I was weary, and as I lay pondering it, sleep overcame
me. Now I know!'
 'Yes, there can be no doubt,' said Aragorn. 'At last we know the link between
Isengard and Mordor, and how it worked. Much is explained.'
 'Strange powers have our enemies, and strange weaknesses!' said Theoden. 'But
it has long been said: oft evil will shall evil mar.'
 'That many times is seen,' said Gandalf. 'But at this time we have been strangely
fortunate. Maybe, I have been saved by this hobbit from a grave blunder. I had
considered whether or not to probe this Stone myself to find its uses. Had I done so,
I should have been revealed to him myself. I am not ready for such a trial, if indeed I
shall ever be so. But even if I found the power to withdraw myself, it would be
disastrous for him to see me, yet – until the hour comes when secrecy will avail no
longer.'
'That hour is now come, I think,' said Aragorn.
 'Not yet,' said Gandalf. 'There remains a short while of doubt which we must use.
The Enemy, it is clear, thought that the Stone was in Orthanc – why should he not?
And that therefore the hobbit was captive there, driven to look in the glass for his
torment by Saruman. That dark mind will be filled now with the voice and face of the
hobbit and with expectation: it may take some time before he learns his error. We
must snatch that time. We have been too leisurely. We must move. The
neighbourhood of Isengard is no place now to linger in. I will ride ahead at once with
Peregrin Took. It will be better for him than lying in the dark while others sleep.'
 'I will keep Eomer and ten Riders,' said the king. 'They shall ride with me at early
day. The rest may go with Aragorn and ride as soon as they have a mind.'
 'As you will,' said Gandalf. 'But make all the speed you may to the cover of the
hills, to Helm's Deep!'
 132
 At that moment a shadow fell over them. The bright moonlight seemed to be
suddenly cut off. Several of the Riders cried out, and crouched, holding their arms
above their heads, as if to ward off a blow from above: a blind fear and a deadly cold
fell on them. Cowering they looked up. A vast winged shape passed over the moon
like a black cloud. It wheeled and went north, flying at a speed greater than any wind
of Middle-earth. The stars fainted before it. It was gone.
 They stood up, rigid as stones. Gandalf was gazing up, his arms out and
downwards, stiff, his hands clenched.
 'Nazgul!' he cried. 'The messenger of Mordor. The storm is coming. The Nazgul
have crossed the River! Ride, ride! Wait not for the dawn! Let not the swift wait for
the slow! Ride!'
 He sprang away, calling Shadowfax as he ran. Aragorn followed him. Going to
Pippin, Gandalf picked him up in his arms. 'You shall come with me this time,' he
said. 'Shadowfax shall show you his paces.' Then he ran to the place where he had
slept. Shadowfax stood there already. Slinging the small bag which was all his
luggage across his shoulders, the wizard leapt upon the horse's back. Aragorn lifted
Pippin and set him in Gandalf's arms, wrapped in cloak and blanket.
 'Farewell! Follow fast!' cried Gandalf. 'Away, Shadowfax!'
 The great horse tossed his head. His flowing tail flicked in the moonlight. Then he
leapt forward, spurning the earth, and was gone like the north wind from the
mountains.
 'A beautiful, restful night!' said Merry to Aragorn. 'Some folk have wonderful luck.
He did not want to sleep, and he wanted to ride with Gandalf – and there he goes!
Instead of being turned into a stone himself to stand here for ever as a warning.'
 'If you had been the first to lift the Orthanc-stone, and not he, how would it be
now?' said Aragorn. 'You might have done worse. Who can say? But now it is your
luck to come with me, I fear. At once. Go and get ready, and bring anything that
Pippin left behind. Make haste!'
 Over the plains Shadowfax was flying, needing no urging and no guidance. Less
than an hour had passed, and they had reached the Fords of Isen and crossed them.
The Mound of the Riders and its cold spears lay grey behind them.
 Pippin was recovering. He was warm, but the wind in his face was keen and
refreshing. He was with Gandalf. The horror of the stone and of the hideous shadow
over the moon was fading, things left behind in the mists of the mountains or in a
passing dream. He drew a deep breath.
 'I did not know you rode bare-back, Gandalf,' he said. 'You haven't a saddle or a
bridle!'
 'I do not ride elf-fashion, except on Shadowfax,' said Gandalf. 'But Shadowfax will
have no harness. You do not ride Shadowfax: he is willing to carry you – or not. If he
is willing, that is enough. It is then his business to see that you remain on his back,
unless you jump off into the air.'
 'How fast is he going?' asked Pippin. 'Fast by the wind, but very smooth. And how
light his footfalls are!'
 'He is running now as fast as the swiftest horse could gallop,' answered Gandalf,
'but that is not fast for him. The land is rising a little here, and is more broken than it
was beyond the river. But see how the White Mountains are drawing near under the
stars! Yonder are the Thrihyrne peaks like black spears. It will not be long before we
reach the branching roads and come to the Deeping-coomb, where the battle was
fought two nights ago.'
 Pippin was silent again for a while. He heard Gandalf singing softly to himself,
 133
murmuring brief snatches of rhyme in many tongues, as the miles ran under them. At
last the wizard passed into a song of which the hobbit caught the words: a few lines
came clear to his ears through the rushing of the wind:
Tall ships and tall kings
Three times three,
What brought they from the foundered land
Over the flowing sea?
Seven stars and seven stones
And one white tree.
 'What are you saying, Gandalf?' asked Pippin.
 'I was just running over some of the Rhymes of Lore in my mind,' answered the
wizard. 'Hobbits, I suppose, have forgotten them, even those that they ever knew.'
 'No, not all,' said Pippin. 'And we have many of our own, which wouldn't interest
you, perhaps. But I have never heard this one. What is it about – the seven stars and
seven stones?'
 'About the palantiri of the Kings of Old,' said Gandalf.
 'And what are they?'
 'The name meant that which looks far away. The Orthanc-stone was one.'
 'Then it was not made, not made' – Pippin hesitated – 'by the Enemy?'
 'No,' said Gandalf. 'Nor by Saruman. It is beyond his art, and beyond Sauron's too.
The palantiri came from beyond Westernesse from Eldamar. The Noldor made them.
Feanor himself, maybe, wrought them, in days so long ago that the time cannot be
measured in years. But there is nothing that Sauron cannot turn to evil uses. Alas for
Saruman! It was his downfall, as I now perceive. Perilous to us all are the devices of
an art deeper than we possess ourselves. Yet he must bear the blame. Fool! to keep
it secret, for his own profit. No word did he ever speak of it to any of the Council. We
had not yet given thought to the fate of the palantiri of Gondor in its ruinous wars. By
Men they were almost forgotten. Even in Gondor they were a secret known only to a
few; in Arnor they were remembered only in a rhyme of lore among the Dunedain.'
 'What did the Men of old use them for?' asked Pippin, delighted and astonished at
getting answers to so many questions, and wondering how long it would last.
 'To see far off, and to converse in thought with one another,' said Gandalf. 'In that
way they long guarded and united the realm of Gondor. They set up Stones at Minas
Anor, and at Minas Ithil, and at Orthanc in the ring of Isengard. The chief and master
of these was under the Dome of Stars at Osgiliath before its ruin. The three others
were far away in the North. In the house of Elrond it is told that they were at
Annuminas, and Amon Sul, and Elendil's Stone was on the Tower Hills that look
towards Mithlond in the Gulf of Lune where the grey ships lie.
 'Each palantir replied to each, but all those in Gondor were ever open to the view
of Osgiliath. Now it appears that, as the rock of Orthanc has withstood the storms of
time, so there the palantir of that tower has remained. But alone it could do nothing
but see small images of things far off and days remote. Very useful, no doubt, that
was to Saruman; yet it seems that he was not content. Further and further abroad he
gazed, until he cast his gaze upon Barad-dur. Then he was caught!
 'Who knows where the lost Stones of Arnor and Gondor now lie buried, or drowned
deep? But one at least Sauron must have obtained and mastered to his purposes. I
guess that it was the Ithil-stone, for he took Minas Ithil long ago and turned it into an
evil place: Minas Morgul, it has become.
 134
 'Easy it is now to guess how quickly the roving eye of Saruman was trapped and
held; and how ever since he has been persuaded from afar, and daunted when
persuasion would not serve. The biter bit, the hawk under the eagle's foot, the spider
in a steel web! How long, I wonder, has he been constrained to come often to his
glass for inspection and instruction, and the Orthanc-stone so bent towards Baraddur that, if any save a
will of adamant now looks into it, it will bear his mind and sight
swiftly thither? And how it draws one to itself! Have I not felt it? Even now my heart
desires to test my will upon it, to see if I could not wrench it from him and turn it
where I would – to look across the wide seas of water and of time to Tirion the Fair,
and perceive the unimaginable hand and mind of Feanor at their work, while both the
White Tree and the Golden were in flower!' He sighed and fell silent.
 'I wish I had known all this before,' said Pippin. 'I had no notion of what I was
doing.'
 'Oh yes, you had,' said Gandalf. 'You knew you were behaving wrongly and
foolishly; and you told yourself so, though you did not listen. I did not tell you all this
before, because it is only by musing on all that has happened that I have at last
understood, even as we ride together. But if I had spoken sooner, it would not have
lessened your desire, or made it easier to resist. On the contrary! No, the burned
hand teaches best. After that advice about fire goes to the heart.'
 'It does,' said Pippin. 'If all the seven stones were laid out before me now, I should
shut my eyes and put my hands in my pockets.'
 'Good!' said Gandalf. 'That is what I hoped.'
 'But I should like to know–' Pippin began.
 'Mercy!' cried Gandalf. 'If the giving of information is to be the cure of your
inquisitiveness, I shall spend all the rest of my days in answering you. What more do
you want to know?'
 'The names of all the stars, and of all living things, and the whole history of Middleearth and
Over-heaven and of the Sundering Seas,' laughed Pippin. 'Of course!
What less? But I am not in a hurry tonight. At the moment I was just wondering about
the black shadow. I heard you shout "messenger of Mordor". What was it? What
could it do at Isengard?'
 'It was a Black Rider on wings, a Nazgul,' said Gandalf. 'It could have taken you
away to the Dark Tower.'
 'But it was not coming for me, was it?' faltered Pippin. 'I mean, it didn't know that I
had… '
 'Of course not,' said Gandalf. 'It is two hundred leagues or more in straight flight
from Barad-dur to Orthanc, and even a Nazgul would take a few hours to fly between
them. But Saruman certainly looked in the Stone since the orc-raid, and more of his
secret thought, I do not doubt, has been read than he intended. A messenger has
been sent to find out what he is doing. And after what has happened tonight another
will come, I think, and swiftly. So Saruman will come to the last pinch of the vice that
he has put his hand in. He has no captive to send. He has no Stone to see with, and
cannot answer the summons. Sauron will only believe that he is withholding the
captive and refusing to use the Stone. It will not help Saruman to tell the truth to the
messenger. For Isengard may be ruined, yet he is still safe in Orthanc. So whether
he will or no, he will appear a rebel. Yet he rejected us, so as to avoid that very thing!
What he will do in such a plight, I cannot guess. He has power still, I think, while in
Orthanc, to resist the Nine Riders. He may try to do so. He may try to trap the
Nazgul, or at least to slay the thing on which it now rides the air. In that case let
Rohan look to its horses!
 135
 'But I cannot tell how it will fall out, well or ill for us. It may be that the counsels of
the Enemy will be confused, or hindered by his wrath with Saruman. It may be that
he will learn that I was there and stood upon the stairs of Orthanc – with hobbits at
my tail. Or that an heir of Elendil lives and stood beside me. If Wormtongue was not
deceived by the armour of Rohan, he would remember Aragorn and the title that he
claimed. That is what I fear. And so we fly – not from danger but into greater danger.
Every stride of Shadowfax bears you nearer to the Land of Shadow, Peregrin Took.'
 Pippin made no answer, but clutched his cloak, as if a sudden chill had struck him.
Grey land passed under them.
 'See now!' said Gandalf. 'The Westfold dales are opening before us. Here we come
back to the eastward road. The dark shadow yonder is the mouth of the Deepingcoomb. That way lies
Aglarond and the Glittering Caves. Do not ask me about them.
Ask Gimli, if you meet again, and for the first time you may get an answer longer
than you wish. You will not see the caves yourself, not on this journey. Soon they will
be far behind.'
 'I thought you were going to stop at Helm's Deep!' said Pippin. 'Where are you
going then?'
 'To Minas Tirith, before the seas of war surround it.'
 'Oh! And how far is that?'
 'Leagues upon leagues,' answered Gandalf. 'Thrice as far as the dwellings of King
Theoden, and they are more than a hundred miles east from here, as the
messengers of Mordor fly. Shadowfax must run a longer road. Which will prove the
swifter?
 'We shall ride now till daybreak, and that is some hours away. Then even
Shadowfax must rest, in some hollow of the hills: at Edoras, I hope. Sleep, if you
can! You may see the first glimmer of dawn upon the golden roof of the house of
Eorl. And in two days thence you shall see the purple shadow of Mount Mindolluin
and the walls of the tower of Denethor white in the morning.
 'Away now, Shadowfax! Run, greatheart, run as you have never run before! Now
we are come to the lands where you were foaled and every stone you know. Run
now! Hope is in speed!'
 Shadowfax tossed his head and cried aloud, as if a trumpet had summoned him to
battle. Then he sprang forward. Fire flew from his feet; night rushed over him.
 As he fell slowly into sleep, Pippin had a strange feeling: he and Gandalf were still
as stone, seated upon the statue of a running horse, while the world rolled away
beneath his feet with a great noise of wind. 
